Utah statutes.
41-1a-704.   Transfer by operation of law.

(1)Except as provided under Subsection (2), if the title or interest of an owner in or to a registered vehicle passes to another person other than by voluntary transfer:

(a)  the registration of the vehicle expires; and

(b)  the vehicle may not be operated upon a highway until the person entitled to possession of the vehicle applies for and obtains a valid registration or temporary permit.

(2) (a)  A vehicle under Subsection (1) may be operated on the highways by the person entitled to its possession or his legal representative, for a distance not exceeding 75 miles, upon displaying on the vehicle the license plates issued to the former owner.

(b)  If title is vested in a person holding a lien or encumbrance on the vehicle, the new title holder may apply to the Motor Vehicle Enforcement Division for special plates issued under Section 41-3-505 to transporters and may operate the repossessed vehicle under the special plate for the purposes of:

(i)  transporting the vehicle to a garage or warehouse; or

(ii)  demonstrating the vehicle for sale.

